Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3159
Employer providing services; tax credit; amount; application; approval.

(1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an employer shall be eligible to receive a credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 if such employer provides any of the following types of services to an individual pursuant to a medicaid home and community-based services waiver:

(a) Prevocational;

(b) Supported employment - individual;

(c) Small group vocational support; or

(d) Supported employment - follow along.

(2) The tax credit shall be in an amount equal to one thousand dollars multiplied by the number of individuals described in subsection (1) of this section who received the applicable services from the employer during the taxable year.

(3) The tax credit provided in this section shall be a nonrefundable tax credit.

(4) An employer shall apply for the credit provided in this section by submitting an application to the department on a form prescribed by the department. Subject to subsection (5) of this section, if the department determines that the employer qualifies for tax credits under this section, the department shall approve the application and certify the amount of credits approved to the employer.

(5) The department shall consider applications in the order in which they are received and may approve tax credits under this section in any year until the aggregate limit allowed under section 77-3160 has been reached.

(6) An employer shall claim any tax credits granted under this section by attaching the tax credit certification received from the department under subsection (4) of this section to the employer's tax return.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 39.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.